New Jersey, session 221, A4519.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, upon the sale of a State-owned property used by a nonprofit agency or organization contracted with the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services for at least 10 years to provide housing for adults with developmental disabilities: (1) the division shall allow the agency or organization to pay off any lien placed against the property at a rate of 50 percent; and (2) the Department of the Treasury shall transfer any revenues or proceeds from the sale of the property to the agency or organization. b.  If any lien placed against the property is paid off by the agency or organization at the rate of 50 percent pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section, the Department of the Treasury is authorized to file with clerk of the county, register of deeds and mortgages, or clerk of the Superior Court, as appropriate, a duly acknowledged certificate or warrant setting forth the departments request to discharge the remaining portion of the lien. c.  The revenues or proceeds from the sale of a State-owned property transferred by the Department of the Treasury to the nonprofit agency or organization pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section shall be used by the agency or organization to: (1) purchase a new property or renovate an existing property to provide housing for adults with developmental disabilities; or (2) expand or improve the services provided by the agency to adults with developmental disabilities. 2.  The Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.